Massachusetts, session 194th, H1819.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 22 of chapter 211 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking the figure “$232,101” and inserting in place thereof the figure “$267,101”.
SECTION 2. Said Section 22 of chapter 211 is hereby further amended by striking the
figure $226,187 and inserting in place thereof the figure “$261,187”.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of chapter 211A of the General Laws, is hereby further amended
by striking the figure “$219,856” and inserting in place thereof the figure “$254,856”.
SECTION 4. Said section 2 is hereby further amended by striking the figure “$213,966”
and inserting in place thereof the figure “$248,966”.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of Chapter 211B of the General Laws is hereby further amended
by striking the figure: “$207,855” and inserting in place thereof the figure “$242,855”.
of 2

SECTION 6. Said Section 4 is hereby further amended by striking the figure “$213,966
and inserting in place there of the figure “$248,966”.
SECTION 7. Said section 4 is hereby further amended by striking the figure 220,160 and
inserting in place thereof the figure $255, 160.
SECTION 8. The provisions of the act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
of 2